ava_abbr.lexd
LEXICON ABBR 

<abbr>: # ; 

LEXICON Abbreviations

ва гь. г. ц.:ва гь. г. ц. ABBR ; # ""
ва гь. ц.:ва гь. ц. ABBR ; # "и т. п"
ва гь. ц.:ва гь.ц. ABBR ; # "и т. п" # Dir/LR

инг.:инг. ABBR ; 
норв.:норв. ABBR ;
кг:кг ABBR ; # ""
км:км ABBR ; # ""
см:см ABBR ; # ""
млн:млн ABBR ; # ""
кв км:кв км ABBR ; # ""
млрд:млрд ABBR ; # ""
